Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-560
Directors; board; powers.

The board shall have the following powers concerning the management, control, delivery, use and distribution of water by the district, to wit:

(1) To make and enforce all reasonable rules and regulations for the management, control, delivery, use and distribution of water;

(2) To withhold the delivery of water upon which there are any defaults or delinquencies of payment;

(3) To provide for and declare forfeitures of contracts for water service upon default or failure to comply with any order, contract or agreement for service;

(4) To provide for and grant the right, upon terms, to transfer water service from lands to which water service has been furnished to other lands within the district and to discharge liens from lands to which same was theretofore attached and to create liens, as provided in sections 46-501 to 46-573, upon lands to which the use of such water service is transferred.

Laws 1947, c. 173, § 26, p. 550.

This section confers upon the board of directors certain defined powers concerning the management, control, delivery, use, and distribution of water by the reclamation district. Nebraska Mid-State Reclamation District v. Hall County, 152 Neb. 410, 41 N.W.2d 397 (1950).